Florida, session 2026, SB1316.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 110 111 Section 1.âSection 908.14, Florida Statutes, is created to 112 read: 113 908.14âMarriage fraud.â 114 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âmarriage fraudâ 115 means knowingly entering into a marriage for the purpose of 116 evading immigration laws and engaging in acts of violence, 117 manipulation, abuse, coercion, or emotional or financial harm, 118 when the perpetrator is a person who is not a citizen of the 119 United States. 120 (2)âThere is created a cause of action for an injunction 121 for protection in cases of marriage fraud. 122 (a)âA person who is the victim of marriage fraud has 123 standing in the circuit court to file a verified petition for an 124 injunction for protection against marriage fraud on his or her 125 own behalf, regardless of whether criminal charges based on the 126 marriage fraud have been filed, reduced, or dismissed. 127 (b)âThis cause of action for an injunction may be sought 128 regardless of whether any other petition, complaint, or cause of 129 action is currently available or pending between the parties. 130 (c)âThis cause of action for an injunction does not require 131 that the petitioner be represented by an attorney. 132 (3)(a)âThe clerk of the court shall provide a copy of this 133 section, simplified forms, and clerical assistance for the 134 preparation and filing of a petition for an injunction for 135 protection against marriage fraud by any person who is not 136 represented by an attorney. 137 (b)âNotwithstanding any other law, the clerk of the court 138 may not charge a fee for filing a petition for an injunction for 139 protection against marriage fraud. However, subject to 140 legislative appropriation, the clerk of the court may, each 141 quarter, submit to the Justice Administrative Commission a 142 certified request for reimbursement for petitions for such 143 injunctions issued by the court under this section, at the rate 144 of $40 per petition. The request for reimbursement must be 145 submitted in the form and manner prescribed by the Justice 146 Administrative Commission. From this reimbursement, the clerk of 147 the court shall pay any law enforcement agency serving the 148 injunction the fee requested by the law enforcement agency; 149 however, this fee may not exceed $20. 150 (c)âA bond may not be required by the court for the entry 151 of an injunction. 152 (d)âThe clerk of the court shall provide the petitioner 153 with a certified copy of any injunction for protection against 154 marriage fraud entered by the court. 155 (4)(a)âThe verified petition must allege an incident of 156 marriage fraud and must include the specific facts and 157 circumstances that form the basis upon which relief is sought. 158 (b)âThe verified petition must be in substantially the 159 following form: 160 161 PETITION FOR INJUNCTION FOR PROTECTION 162 AGAINST MARRIAGE FRAUD 163 164 The undersigned petitioner ...(name)... declares under 165 penalties of perjury that the following statements are true: 166 167 1.âPetitioner resides at ...(address)... 168 2.âRespondent resides at ...(address)... 169 3.âPetitioner is the victim of marriage fraud as 170 demonstrated by the fact that respondent is not a citizen of the 171 United States and has: ...(list the specific behavior or conduct 172 that leads the petitioner to have reasonable cause to believe 173 that the respondent committed marriage fraud)... 174 4.âPetitioner seeks: an immediate injunction against the 175 respondent, enjoining him or her from committing any further 176 acts of violence, manipulation, abuse, coercion, or emotional or 177 financial harm; and an injunction providing any terms the court 178 deems necessary for the protection of the petitioner and the 179 petitionerâs immediate family, including any injunctions or 180 directives to law enforcement agencies. 181 182 (c)âEvery petition for an injunction against marriage fraud 183 must contain, directly above the signature line, a statement in 184 all capital letters and bold type not smaller than the 185 surrounding text, as follows: 186 187 UNDER PENALTIES OF PERJURY, I DECLARE THAT I HAVE READ THE 188 FOREGOING DOCUMENT AND THAT THE FACTS STATED IN IT ARE TRUE. I 189 UNDERSTAND THAT THE STATEMENTS MADE IN THIS PETITION ARE BEING 190 MADE UNDER PENALTIES OF PERJURY, PUNISHABLE AS PROVIDED IN 191 SECTION 92.525, FLORIDA STATUTES. 192 193 ...(initials)... 194 195 (5)âUpon the filing of the petition, the court shall set a 196 hearing to be held at the earliest possible time. The respondent 197 shall be personally served with a copy of the petition, notice 198 of hearing, and temporary injunction, if any, before the 199 hearing. 200 (6)(a)âIf it appears to the court that an immediate and 201 present danger of violence exists, the court may grant a 202 temporary injunction, which may be granted in an ex parte 203 hearing pending a full hearing, and may grant such relief as the 204 court deems proper, including an injunction enjoining the 205 respondent from committing any acts of violence. 206 (b)âExcept as provided in s. 90.204, in a hearing ex parte 207 for the purpose of obtaining such temporary injunction, only 208 verified pleadings or affidavits may be used as evidence, unless 209 the respondent appears at the hearing or has received reasonable 210 notice of the hearing. 211 (c)âAny such ex parte temporary injunction shall be 212 effective for a fixed period not to exceed 15 days. A full 213 hearing must be set for a date no later than the date on which 214 the temporary injunction ceases to be effective. The court may 215 grant a continuance of the ex parte temporary injunction and the 216 full hearing before or during a hearing for good cause shown by 217 any party. 218 (7)(a)âUpon notice and hearing, the court may grant such 219 relief as the court deems proper, including an injunction: 220 1.âEnjoining the respondent from committing any acts of 221 violence, manipulation, abuse, coercion, or emotional or 222 financial harm. 223 2.âOrdering such other relief as the court deems necessary 224 for the protection of the petitioner, including injunctions or 225 directives to law enforcement agencies, as provided in this 226 section. 227 (b)âThe terms of the injunction remain in full force and 228 effect until modified or dissolved. Either party may move at any 229 time to modify or dissolve the injunction. Such relief may be 230 granted in addition to other civil or criminal remedies. 231 (c)âA temporary or final judgment on injunction for 232 protection against marriage fraud entered pursuant to this 233 section must, on its face, indicate all of the following: 234 1.âThat the injunction is valid and enforceable in all 235 counties of the State of Florida. 236 2.âThat law enforcement officers may make a warrantless 237 arrest to enforce the terms of the injunction. 238 3.âThat the court had jurisdiction over the parties and 239 matter under the laws of Florida and reasonable notice and 240 opportunity to be heard was given to the person against whom the 241 order is sought sufficient to protect that personâs right to due 242 process. 243 4.âThe date that the respondent was served with the 244 temporary or final order, if obtainable. 245 (8)(a)1.âWithin 24 hours after the court issues an 246 injunction for protection against marriage fraud, the clerk of 247 the court shall electronically transmit a copy of the petition, 248 notice of hearing, and temporary injunction, if any, to the 249 sheriff or a law enforcement agency of the county where the 250 respondent resides or can be found, who shall serve it upon the 251 respondent as soon thereafter as possible on any day of the week 252 and at any time of the day or night. An electronic copy of an 253 injunction must be certified by the clerk of the court, and the 254 electronic copy must be served in the same manner as a certified 255 copy. Upon receiving an electronic copy of the injunction, the 256 sheriff must verify receipt with the sender before attempting to 257 serve it upon the respondent. In addition, if the sheriff is in 258 possession of an injunction for protection that has been 259 certified by the clerk of the court, the sheriff may 260 electronically transmit a copy of that injunction to a law 261 enforcement officer who shall serve it in the same manner as a 262 certified copy. The clerk of the court is responsible for 263 furnishing to the sheriff such information on the respondentâs 264 physical description and location as is required by the 265 Department of Law Enforcement to comply with the verification 266 procedures set forth in this section. Notwithstanding any other 267 law to the contrary, the chief judge of each circuit, in 268 consultation with the appropriate sheriff, may authorize a law 269 enforcement agency within the chief judgeâs jurisdiction to 270 effect this type of service and to receive a portion of the 271 service fee. A person may not serve or execute an injunction 272 issued under this section unless the person is a law enforcement 273 officer as defined in chapter 943. 274 2.âWhen an injunction is issued, if the petitioner requests 275 the assistance of a law enforcement agency, the court may order 276 that an officer from the appropriate law enforcement agency 277 accompany the petitioner and assist in the execution or service 278 of the injunction. A law enforcement officer must accept a copy 279 of an injunction for protection against marriage fraud, 280 certified by the clerk of the court, from the petitioner and 281 immediately serve it upon a respondent who has been located but 282 not yet served. 283 (b)1.âWithin 24 hours after the court issues, changes, or 284 vacates an injunction for protection against marriage fraud, the 285 clerk of the court must electronically transmit a copy of the 286 injunction to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the residence 287 of the petitioner. 288 2.âWithin 24 hours after the court issues an injunction for 289 protection against marriage fraud, the clerk of the court must 290 electronically transmit a copy of the injunction to the State 291 Board of Immigration Enforcement, which must coordinate with 292 local law enforcement agencies and the Federal Government for 293 the purpose of enforcing state and federal immigration laws as 294 appropriate. 295 3.âWithin 24 hours after service of process of an 296 injunction for protection against marriage fraud upon a 297 respondent, the law enforcement officer must electronically 298 transmit the written proof of service of process to the sheriff 299 with jurisdiction over the residence of the petitioner. 300 4.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff receives a certified 301 copy of the injunction for protection against marriage fraud, 302 the sheriff must make information relating to the injunction 303 available to other law enforcement agencies by electronically 304 transmitting such information to the Department of Law 305 Enforcement. 306 5.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff or other law 307 enforcement officer has made service upon the respondent and the 308 sheriff has been so notified, the sheriff must make information 309 relating to the service available to other law enforcement 310 agencies by electronically transmitting such information to the 311 Department of Law Enforcement. 312 6.âSubject to available funding, the Florida Association of 313 Court Clerks and Comptrollers shall develop an automated process 314 by which a petitioner may request notification of service of the 315 injunction for protection against marriage fraud and other court 316 actions related to the injunction. The automated notice must be 317 made within 12 hours after the sheriff or other law enforcement 318 officer serves the injunction upon the respondent. The 319 notification must include, at a minimum, the date, time, and 320 location where the injunction was served. The Florida 321 Association of Court Clerks and Comptrollers may apply for any 322 available grants to fund the development of the automated 323 process. 324 7.âWithin 24 hours after an injunction for protection 325 against marriage fraud is vacated, terminated, or otherwise 326 rendered no longer effective by ruling of the court, the clerk 327 of the court must notify the sheriff or local law enforcement 328 agency that received original notification of the injunction as 329 provided in subparagraph (a)1. Such sheriff or agency shall, 330 within 24 hours after receiving such notification from the clerk 331 of the court, notify the Department of Law Enforcement of the 332 action of the court. 333 (9)(a)âThe court may enforce a violation of an injunction 334 for protection against marriage fraud through a civil or 335 criminal contempt proceeding, and the state attorney may 336 prosecute it as a criminal violation under s. 908.141. Any fine 337 or assessment ordered by the court enforcing such injunction 338 shall be collected by the clerk of the court and transferred on 339 a monthly basis to the Department of Revenue for deposit into 340 the Domestic Violence Trust Fund. 341 (b)âIf the respondent is arrested by a law enforcement 342 officer for a violation of an injunction for protection against 343 marriage fraud, the respondent shall be held in custody until 344 brought before the court as expeditiously as possible for the 345 purpose of enforcing the injunction and for admittance to bail 346 in accordance with chapter 903 and the applicable rules of 347 criminal procedure, pending a hearing. 348 (10)âA law enforcement officer acting in good faith under 349 this section and the officerâs employing agency are immune from 350 all liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be 351 incurred or imposed by reason of the officerâs or agencyâs 352 actions in carrying out the provisions of this section. 353 Section 2.âSection 908.141, Florida Statutes, is created to 354 read: 355 908.141âViolation of an injunction for protection against 356 marriage fraud.â 357 (1)âIn the event of a violation of an injunction for 358 protection against marriage fraud issued under s. 908.14, when 359 the person who violated such injunction has not been arrested, 360 the petitioner may contact the clerk of the court of the county 361 in which the violation is alleged to have occurred. The clerk of 362 the court shall assist the petitioner in the preparation of an 363 affidavit in support of the violation or direct the petitioner 364 to the office operated by the court within the circuit which has 365 been designated by the chief judge of the judicial circuit as 366 the central intake point for injunction violations and where the 367 petitioner can receive assistance in the preparation of the 368 affidavit in support of the violation. 369 (2)âThe affidavit must be immediately forwarded by the 370 clerk of the court or the office assisting the petitioner to the 371 state attorney of the circuit and to the court or judge as the 372 chief judge of the circuit determines to be the recipient of 373 affidavits of violation. If the affidavit alleges that a crime 374 has been committed, the clerk of the court or the office 375 assisting the petitioner shall also forward a copy of the 376 affidavit to the appropriate law enforcement agency for 377 investigation. Within 20 days after receipt of the affidavit, 378 the local law enforcement agency shall complete its 379 investigation and forward a report to the state attorney. The 380 state attorney shall determine within 30 business days whether 381 its office will proceed to file criminal charges, prepare a 382 motion for an order to show cause as to why the respondent 383 should not be held in criminal contempt, prepare both as 384 alternative findings, or file notice that the case remains under 385 investigation or is pending subject to another action. 386 (3)âIf, based on its familiarity with the case, the court 387 has knowledge that the victim of marriage fraud as defined in s. 388 908.14(1) is in immediate danger if the court fails to act 389 before the decision of the state attorney to prosecute, it may 390 immediately issue an order of appointment of the state attorney 391 to file a motion for an order to show cause as to why the 392 respondent should not be held in contempt. If the court does not 393 issue an order of appointment of the state attorney, it shall 394 immediately notify the state attorney that the court is 395 proceeding to enforce the violation through a ruling of criminal 396 contempt. 397 (4)âA person who willfully violates an injunction for 398 protection against marriage fraud commits a misdemeanor of the 399 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 400 775.083. A person violates such injunction by: 401 (a)âRefusing to vacate the dwelling shared with the victim; 402 (b)âGoing to or being within 500 feet of the victimâs 403 residence; 404 (c)âCommitting any other violation of the injunction 405 through an intentional unlawful threat, word, or act to do 406 violence to the victim; 407 (d)âTelephoning, contacting, or otherwise communicating 408 with the victim directly or indirectly, unless the injunction 409 specifically allows indirect contact through a third party; 410 (e)âKnowingly and intentionally coming within 100 feet of 411 the victimâs motor vehicle, regardless of whether that vehicle 412 is occupied; or 413 (f)âDefacing or destroying the victimâs personal property. 414 (5)âA person who has two or more prior convictions for 415 violation of an injunction or foreign protection order accorded 416 full faith and credit pursuant to s. 741.315 against the same 417 victim, and who subsequently commits a violation of any 418 injunction or foreign protection order accorded full faith and 419 credit pursuant to s. 741.315 against the same victim, commits a 420 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 421 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. For purposes of this 422 subsection, the term âconvictionâ means a determination of guilt 423 which is the result of a plea or a trial, regardless of whether 424 adjudication is withheld or a plea of nolo contendere is 425 entered. 426 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.